Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 6. State Air Navigation Facilities

§ 801.
Establishment of air navigation facilities.

When it is determined by the Secretary that aeronautic development and safety in this State will be furthered, the Agency is authorized to establish, acquire, own, and operate air navigational facilities including radio air navigational aids the operation of which has been discontinued by federal, municipal, or private agencies, or when the Agency has been notified by proper authorities that radio air navigational aid will be discontinued.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 802.
Establishment or acquisition of radio air navigational aid.

In establishing or acquiring a radio air navigational aid, the Agency shall determine the degree to which its operation will further the safety of air navigation within its effective range and the degree to which this purpose might be served by other operating aids, if any, in the vicinity.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 803.
Lease and operation of radio air navigational aid.

As an alternative to acquiring and owning an existing radio air navigational aid, the Agency is authorized at its discretion to lease and operate such a facility if the purposes of safety and economy will be equally served.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 804.
Acquisition of airports.

For the purposes of establishing a permanent system of airports within the State, the Secretary, with the approval of the Governor and the General Assembly, may acquire title by agreement or condemnation to an airport which has been discontinued by the owner as an air navigational facility. The title to the airport may be acquired by lease for the purpose of continuing its use as an airport open to the public.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 805.
Acquisition of areas for safe approaches.

The Agency may acquire control by lease or agreement of an area extending from the end of each runway and of such dimensions as are deemed necessary to provide safe approaches.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 806.
Improvements.

After acquiring title to an airport, the Agency may make such improvements as are deemed essential to its use by the public.
Improvements may include access roads or rights-of-way, buildings, grading, marking and seeding of runways, and routine airport maintenance.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 807.
Lease for aircraft hangars and other structures; lease to business entities.

A designated area or areas on the airport may be leased to a person for the purpose of constructing aircraft hangars, repair shops, or other structures compatible with the use and operation of the airport.

A designated area or areas on the airport may also be leased to any business entity consistent with Federal Aviation Administration requirements.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2017, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 25, 2018.

§ 808.
Maintenance of airports.

The Secretary shall be responsible for the maintenance of the airport in a manner consistent with its anticipated type of use by the public.
According to its location and traffic needs and available appropriations, the airport may be held open to the public continuously or closed for such seasons or annual periods as the Secretary deems advisable.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 809.
Personnel and equipment.

Employees may be retained for management and maintenance purposes as are required for one or more State-controlled airports.
Equipment for proper maintenance of airports may be purchased and suitably housed.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.